apertium-la-es.la.dix
    <pardef n="le/gere__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gam</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gemus</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ges</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>getis</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>get</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gent</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gar</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gemur</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>geris</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gemini</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>getur</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gentur</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gero</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gerimus</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>geris</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>geritis</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gerit</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gerint</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gendo</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gendi</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gendo</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gendum</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gendo</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gito</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gitote</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gito</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gunto</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gitor</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gitor</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>guntor</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gite</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gere</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gimini</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gi</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gimus</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisti</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gistis</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>git</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gerunt</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gere</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gi</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="psv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisse</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="infp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>geram</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>geramus</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>geras</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>geratis</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gerat</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gerant</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gissem</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gissemus</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisses</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gissetis</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gisset</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gissent</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gerim</l>
          <r>gere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gerimus</l>

    <e lm="legere"><i>le</i><par n="le/gere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="selegere"><i>sele</i><par n="le/gere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="relegere"><i>rele</i><par n="le/gere__vblex"/></e>
